Maryland, session 2026, HB0970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–701(m) and (n) of Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–701(c) through
(e–1), (f) through (g–1), (h) through (l), (o) through (p–1), and (q) through (t) of Article –
Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–701(f)
through (x), respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–102.

HOUSE BILL 970 3
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(9) Forests are a renewable resource that help the State meet its renewable
energy goals that are consistent with the State’s:
(i) Green power goal for State facilities;
(ii) [Renewable] CLEAN Energy Portfolio Standard;
(iii) Healthy Air Act; and
(iv) Maryland Clean Energy Incentive Act of 2006; and
Article – Public Utilities
7–306.
(g) (5) An eligible customer–generator or the eligible customer–generator’s
assignee shall own and have title to all renewable energy attributes or [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits associated with any electricity produced by its electric generating system.
7–306.2.
(b) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) community solar energy generating systems:
(i) provide residents and businesses, including those that lease
property, increased access to local solar electricity while encouraging private investment in
solar resources;
(ii) enhance continued diversification of the State’s energy resource
mix to achieve the State’s [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard and Greenhouse
Gas Emissions Reduction Act goals; and
(iii) provide electric companies and ratepayers the opportunity to
realize the many benefits associated with distributed energy; and
7–510.3.
(k) (1) Except for the purposes of meeting the requirements of the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard under Subtitle 7 of this title, a community choice
aggregator may not be considered to be an electricity supplier under § 7–507(a) of this
subtitle.
7–701.

HOUSE BILL 970
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(C) “CLEAN ENERGY CREDIT” OR “CREDIT” MEANS A CREDIT EQUAL TO THE
GENERATION ATTRIBUTES OF 1 MEGAWATT–HOUR OF ELECTRICITY THAT IS
DERIVED FROM A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE OR A TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCE
THAT IS:
(1) LOCATED IN THE PJM REGION;
(2) LOCATED OUTSIDE THE AREA DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, BUT IN A CONTROL AREA THAT IS ADJACENT TO THE PJM REGION, IF
THE ELECTRICITY IS DELIVERED INTO THE PJM REGION; OR
(3) LOCATED ON THE OUTER CONTINENTAL SHELF OF THE ATLANTIC
OCEAN IN AN AREA THAT:
(I) THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR
DESIGNATES FOR LEASING AFTER COORDINATION AND CONSULTATION WITH THE
STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 388(A) OF THE ENERGY POLICY ACT OF 2005; AND
(II) IS BETWEEN 10 AND 80 MILES OFF THE COAST OF THE
STATE.
(D) “CLEAN ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD” OR “STANDARD” MEANS THE
PERCENTAGE OF ELECTRICITY SALES AT RETAIL IN THE STATE THAT IS TO BE
DERIVED FROM CLEAN ENERGY SOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–703(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(E) “CLEAN ENERGY SOURCE” MEANS:
(1) A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE; OR
(2) A TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCE.
(k) “Offshore wind [renewable] CLEAN energy credit” or [“OREC”] “OCEC”
means a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit equal to the generation attributes of 1
megawatt–hour of electricity that is derived from offshore wind energy.
(x) “Tier 2 renewable source” means:
(1) hydroelectric power other than pump storage generation; AND

HOUSE BILL 970 5
(2) POWER GENERATED BY A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATION, INCLUDING A SMALL MODULAR REACTOR, CONNECTED WITH THE
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE.
7–702.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) recognize the economic, environmental, fuel diversity, and security
benefits of [renewable] CLEAN energy resources;
(2) reduce greenhouse gas emissions and eliminate carbon–fueled
generation from the State’s electric grid by using these resources;
(3) establish a market for electricity from these resources in Maryland; and
(4) lower the cost to consumers of electricity produced from these resources.
(b) The General Assembly finds AND DECLARES that:
(1) the benefits of electricity from [renewable] CLEAN energy resources,
including long–term decreased emissions, a healthier environment, increased energy
security, and decreased reliance on and vulnerability from imported energy sources, accrue
to the public at large;
(2) electricity suppliers and consumers share an obligation to develop a
minimum level of these resources in the electricity supply portfolio of the State; and
(3) the State needs to increase its reliance on [renewable] CLEAN energy
in order to:
(i) reduce greenhouse gas emissions and meet the State’s
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals under § 2–1205 of the Environment Article; and
(ii) provide opportunities for small, minority, women–owned, and
veteran–owned businesses to participate in and develop a highly skilled workforce for clean
energy industries in the State.
7–703.
(a) (1) (i) The Commission shall implement a [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard that, except as provided under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection,
applies to all retail electricity sales in the State by electricity suppliers.

HOUSE BILL 970
(ii) If the standard becomes applicable to electricity sold to a
customer after the start of a calendar year, the standard does not apply to electricity sold
to the customer during that portion of the year before the standard became applicable.
(2) A [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard may not apply to
electricity sales at retail by any electricity supplier:
(i) in excess of 300,000,000 kilowatt–hours of industrial process load
to a single customer in a year;
(ii) to residential customers in a region of the State in which
electricity prices for residential customers are subject to a freeze or cap contained in a
settlement agreement entered into under § 7–505 of this title until the freeze or cap has
expired; or
(iii) to a customer served by an electric cooperative under an
electricity supplier purchase agreement that existed on October 1, 2004, until the
expiration of the agreement, as the agreement may be renewed or amended.
(3) The portion of a [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard that
represents offshore wind:
(i) applies only to the distribution sales of electric companies; and
(ii) may not apply to distribution sales by any electric company in
excess of:
1. 75,000,000 kilowatt–hours of industrial process load to a
single customer in a year; and
2. 3,000 kilowatt–hours of electricity in a month to a
customer who is an owner of agricultural land and files an Internal Revenue Service form
1040, schedule F.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard shall be as follows:
(1) in 2006, 1% from Tier 1 renewable sources and 2.5% from Tier 2
renewable sources;
(2) in 2007, 1% from Tier 1 renewable sources and 2.5% from Tier 2
renewable sources;
(3) in 2008, 2.005% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least
0.005% derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;

HOUSE BILL 970 7
(4) in 2009, 2.01% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least 0.01%
derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(5) in 2010, 3.025% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least
0.025% derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(6) in 2011, 5.0% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least 0.05%
derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(7) in 2012, 6.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least 0.1%
derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(8) in 2013, 8.2% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least 0.25%
derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(9) in 2014, 10.3% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least 0.35%
derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(10) in 2015, 10.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least 0.5%
derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(11) in 2016, 12.7% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including at least 0.7%
derived from solar energy, and 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(12) in 2017:
(i) 13.1% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 1.15% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(13) in 2018:
(i) 15.8% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 1.5% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(14) in 2019:

HOUSE BILL 970
(i) 20.7% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 5.5% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(15) in 2020:
(i) 28% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 6% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(16) in 2021:
(i) 30.8% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 7.5% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(17) in 2022:
(i) 30.1% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 5.5% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(18) in 2023:
(i) 31.9% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:

HOUSE BILL 970 9
1. at least 6% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy; and
3. at least 0.05% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(19) in 2024:
(i) 33.7% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 6.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy; and
3. at least 0.15% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(20) in 2025:
(i) 35.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 7% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 10%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
3. at least 0.25% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(21) in 2026:
(i) 38% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 8% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 400 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and

HOUSE BILL 970
3. at least 0.5% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(22) in 2027:
(i) 41.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 9.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 400 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 0.75% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(23) in 2028:
(i) 43% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 11% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(24) in 2029:
(i) 49.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 12.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and

HOUSE BILL 970 11
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(25) in 2030 and later:
(i) 50% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 14.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 1,200 megawatts of
Round 2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources.
(d) (1) Subject to subsections (a) and (c) of this section, an electricity supplier
shall meet the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for all Tier 1 and Tier 2
renewable sources except offshore wind by accumulating the equivalent amount of
[renewable] CLEAN energy credits that equal the percentages required under this section.
(2) An electric company shall meet the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard for offshore wind in accordance with § 7–704.2 of this subtitle.
(e) (1) The required percentage of an electric cooperative’s [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard derived from solar energy shall be 2.5% in 2020 and later.
(2) The required percentage of a municipal electric utility’s [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard shall be:
(i) in 2021:
1. 20.4% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
A. at least 1.95% derived from solar energy; and
B. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
2. 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and

HOUSE BILL 970
(ii) in 2022 and later, 20.4% from Tier 1 renewable sources,
including:
1. at least 1.95% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy.
(f) (2) At least 25% of the required percentage of the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio STANDARD for each year as set forth in subsection (b) of this section
derived from post–2022 geothermal systems shall be derived from systems that were
installed:
(i) at single or multifamily housing units that qualified as low or
moderate income housing on the date the system was installed on the property; or
(ii) at institutions that primarily serve low and moderate income
individuals and families, including:
1. schools with a majority of students who are eligible for free
and reduced price meals;
2. hospitals with a majority of patients eligible for financial
assistance or who are enrolled in Medicaid; and
3. other institutions that serve individuals and families
where the majority of those served are eligible based on income for federal or State safety
net programs.
7–704.
(a) (1) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source:
(i) is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard regardless of when the generating system or facility was placed
in service; and
(ii) may be applied to the percentage requirements of the standard
for either Tier 1 renewable sources or Tier 2 renewable sources.
(2) (i) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(1), (5),
or (9)] § 7–701(W)(1), (5), OR (9) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the
[renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard only if the source is connected with the
electric distribution [grid] SYSTEM serving Maryland.

HOUSE BILL 970 13
(ii) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(11)] §
7–701(W)(11) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard only if the source:
1. is connected with the electric distribution [grid] SYSTEM
serving Maryland; or
2. processes wastewater from Maryland residents.
(iii) If the owner of a solar generating system in this State chooses to
sell solar [renewable] CLEAN energy credits from that system, the owner must first offer
the credits for sale to an electricity supplier or electric company that shall apply them
toward compliance with the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under § 7–703
of this subtitle.
(3) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(8)] §
7–701(W)(8) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard if it is generated at a dam that existed as of January 1, 2004,
even if a system or facility that is capable of generating electricity did not exist on that
date.
(4) Energy from a Tier 2 renewable source under [§ 7–701(t)] §
7–701(X) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard if it is generated at a system or facility that existed and was operational
as of January 1, 2004, even if the facility or system was not capable of generating electricity
on that date.
(b) On or after January 1, 2004, an electricity supplier may:
(1) receive [renewable] CLEAN energy credits; and
(2) accumulate [renewable] CLEAN energy credits under this subtitle.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a generating facility that is placed in
service on or after January 1, 2004.
(2) (i) On or before December 31, 2005, an electricity supplier shall
receive 120% credit toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for
energy derived from wind.
(ii) After December 31, 2005, and on or before December 31, 2008,
an electricity supplier shall receive 110% credit toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard for energy derived from wind.

HOUSE BILL 970
(3) On or before December 31, 2008, an electricity supplier shall receive
110% credit toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for energy
derived from methane under [§ 7–701(r)(4)] § 7–701(V)(4) of this subtitle.
(d) An electricity supplier shall receive credit toward meeting the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard for electricity derived from the biomass fraction of
biomass co–fired with other fuels.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “customer” means:
(i) an industrial electric customer that is not on standard offer
service; or
(ii) a renewable on–site generator.
(2) This subsection does not apply to offshore wind [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits.
(3) (i) A customer may independently acquire [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits to satisfy the standards applicable to the customer’s load, including credits
created by a renewable on–site generator.
(ii) Credits that a customer transfers to its electricity supplier to
meet the standard and that the electricity supplier relies on in submitting its compliance
report may not be resold or retransferred by the customer or by the electricity supplier.
(4) A renewable on–site generator may retain or transfer at its sole option
any credits created by the renewable on–site generator, including credits for the portion of
its on–site generation from a Tier 1 renewable source or a Tier 2 renewable source that
displaces the purchase of electricity by the renewable on–site generator from the grid.
(5) A customer that satisfies the standard applicable to the customer’s load
under this subsection may not be required to contribute to a compliance fee recovered under
§ 7–706 of this subtitle.
(6) The Commission shall adopt regulations governing the application and
transfer of credits under this subsection consistent with federal law.
(f) (1) In order to create a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit, a Tier 1
renewable source or Tier 2 renewable source must substantially comply with all applicable
environmental and administrative requirements, including air quality, water quality, solid
waste, and right–to–know provisions, permit conditions, and administrative orders.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to Tier 1 renewable sources that
incinerate solid waste.

HOUSE BILL 970 15
(ii) At least 80% of the solid waste incinerated at a Tier 1 renewable
source facility shall be collected from:
1. for areas in Maryland, jurisdictions that achieve the
recycling rates required under § 9–505 of the Environment Article; and
2. for other states, jurisdictions for which the electricity
supplier demonstrates recycling substantially comparable to that required under § 9–505
of the Environment Article, in accordance with regulations of the Commission.
(iii) An electricity supplier may report credits received under this
paragraph based on compliance by the facility with the percentage requirement of
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph during the year immediately preceding the year in
which the electricity supplier receives the credit to apply to the standard.
(g) (1) Energy from a solar water heating system is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) A person that owns and operates a solar water heating system shall
receive a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit equal to the amount of energy, converted from
BTUs to kilowatt–hours, that is generated by the system that is used by the person for
water heating.
(3) The total amount of energy generated and consumed for a
nonresidential or commercial solar water heating system shall be measured by an on–site
meter that meets the required performance standards of the International Organization of
Legal Metrology.
(4) The total amount of energy generated and consumed by a residential
solar water heating system shall be:
(i) measured by a meter that meets the required standards of the
International Organization of Legal Metrology; or
(ii) 1. measured by the Solar Ratings and Certification
Corporation’s OG–300 thermal performance rating for the system or an equivalent
certification that the Commission approves in consultation with the Administration; and
2. certified to the OG–300 standard of the Solar Ratings and
Certification Corporation or an equivalent certification body that the Commission approves
in consultation with the Administration.
(5) A residential solar water heating system shall be installed in
accordance with applicable State and local plumbing codes.
(6) A residential solar water heating system may not produce more than
five solar [renewable] CLEAN energy credits in any 1 year.

HOUSE BILL 970
(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (6) of this subsection, energy from a
geothermal heating and cooling system, including energy from a legacy geothermal system
and energy from a post–2022 geothermal system, is eligible for inclusion in meeting the
[renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) A person shall receive a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit equal to the
amount of energy, converted from BTUs to kilowatt–hours, that is generated by a
geothermal heating and cooling system for space heating and cooling or water heating if
the person:
(i) owns and operates the system;
(ii) leases and operates the system; or
(iii) contracts with a third party who owns and operates the portion
of the system that consists of:
1. a closed loop or a series of closed loop systems in which
fluid is permanently confined within a pipe or tubing and does not come in contact with the
outside environment; or
2. an open loop system in which ground or surface water is
circulated in an environmentally safe manner directly into the facility and returned to the
same aquifer or surface water source.
(3) To determine the energy savings of a geothermal heating and cooling
system for a residence, the Commission shall:
(i) identify available energy consumption calculators developed by
the geothermal heating and cooling industry;
(ii) collect the following data provided in the [renewable] CLEAN
energy credit application that:
1. describes the name of the applicant and the address at
which the geothermal heating and cooling system is installed; and
2. provides the annual BTU energy savings attributable to
home heating, cooling, and water heating; and
(iii) in determining the annual amount of [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits awarded for the geothermal heating and cooling system, convert the annual BTUs
into annual megawatt–hours.
(4) To determine the energy savings of a nonresidential geothermal
heating and cooling system, the Commission shall:

HOUSE BILL 970 17
(i) use the geothermal heating and cooling engineering technical
system designs provided with the [renewable] CLEAN energy credit application; and
(ii) in determining the annual amount of [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits awarded for the geothermal heating and cooling system, convert the annual BTUs
into annual megawatt–hours.
(5) A geothermal heating and cooling system shall be installed in
accordance with applicable State well construction and local building code standards.
(6) (i) A post–2022 geothermal system with a 360,000 BTU capacity is
eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard only if
the company installing the system provides for its employees:
1. family–sustaining wages;
2. employer–provided health care with affordable
deductibles and co–pays;
3. career advancement training, as provided in
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph;
4. fair scheduling;
5. employer–paid workers’ compensation and unemployment
insurance;
6. a retirement plan;
7. paid time off; and
8. the right to bargain collectively for wages and benefits.
(ii) As part of the career advancement training the installation
company provides, the company shall ensure that a minimum of 10% of the employees
working on the installation are enrolled in an apprenticeship program approved by and
registered with the State or the federal government.
(iii) Compliance with this paragraph shall be regulated and enforced
by the Maryland Department of Labor.
(i) (1) Energy from a thermal biomass system is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) (i) A person that owns and operates a thermal biomass system that
uses anaerobic digestion is eligible to receive a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit.

HOUSE BILL 970
(ii) A person that owns and operates a thermal biomass system that
uses a thermochemical process is eligible to receive a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit if
the person demonstrates to the Maryland Department of the Environment that the
operation of the thermal biomass system:
1. is not significantly contributing to local or regional air
quality impairments; and
2. will substantially decrease emissions of oxides of nitrogen
beyond that achieved by a direct burn combustion unit through the use of precombustion
techniques, combustion techniques, or postcombustion techniques.
(3) A person that is eligible to receive a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit
under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall receive a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit
equal to the amount of energy, converted from BTUs to kilowatt–hours, that is generated
by the thermal biomass system and used on site.
(4) The total amount of energy generated and consumed for a residential,
nonresidential, or commercial thermal biomass system shall be measured by an on–site
meter that meets the required performance standards established by the Commission.
(5) The Commission shall adopt regulations for the metering, verification,
and reporting of the output of thermal biomass systems.
(j) (1) Energy from a wastewater heating or cooling system is eligible for
inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) A person shall receive a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit equal to the
amount of energy, converted from BTUs to kilowatt–hours, that is generated by a
wastewater heating or cooling system for space heating or cooling, industrial heating or
cooling, or another useful thermal purpose, if the person:
(i) owns and operates the system;
(ii) leases and operates the system; or
(iii) contracts with a third party who owns and operates the system.
(3) To determine the energy savings of a wastewater heating or cooling
system, the Commission shall:
(i) use the wastewater heating or cooling engineering technical
system designs provided with the [renewable] CLEAN energy credit application; and

HOUSE BILL 970 19
(ii) in determining the annual amount of [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits awarded for the wastewater heating or cooling system, convert the annual BTUs
into annual megawatt–hours.
(4) The Commission shall adopt regulations for the metering, verification,
and reporting of the output of wastewater heating or cooling systems.
7–704.1.
(a) (4) The Commission shall provide additional application periods
beginning, respectively:
(i) January 1, 2020, for consideration of Round 2 offshore wind
projects to begin creating [ORECs] OCECS not later than 2026;
(ii) January 1, 2021, for consideration of Round 2 offshore wind
projects to begin creating [ORECs] OCECS not later than 2028; and
(iii) January 1, 2022, for consideration of Round 2 offshore wind
projects to begin creating [ORECs] OCECS not later than 2030.
(c) An application shall include:
(4) a proposed [OREC] OCEC pricing schedule for the offshore wind
project that shall specify a price for the generation attributes, including the energy,
capacity, ancillary services, and environmental attributes;
(e) (1) The Commission shall use the following criteria to evaluate and
compare proposed offshore wind projects submitted during an application period:
(i) lowest cost impact on ratepayers of the price set under a proposed
[OREC] OCEC pricing schedule;
(xiii) estimated ability to assist in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle; and
(f) (1) (iii) The Commission may not approve an applicant’s proposed
offshore wind project unless:
1. for a Round 1 offshore wind project application:
A. the projected net rate impact for an average residential
customer, based on annual consumption of 12,000 kilowatt–hours, combined with the
projected net rate impact of other Round 1 offshore wind projects, does not exceed $1.50 per
month in 2012 dollars, over the duration of the proposed [OREC] OCEC pricing schedule;

HOUSE BILL 970
B. the projected net rate impact for all nonresidential
customers considered as a blended average, combined with the projected net rate impact of
other Round 1 offshore wind projects, does not exceed 1.5% of nonresidential customers’
total annual electric bills, over the duration of the proposed [OREC] OCEC pricing
schedule; and
C. the price specified in the proposed [OREC] OCEC pricing
schedule does not exceed $190 per megawatt–hour in 2012 dollars; and
2. for a Round 2 offshore wind project application:
A. the projected incremental net rate impact for an average
residential customer, based on annual consumption of 12 megawatt–hours, combined with
the projected incremental net rate impact of other Round 2 offshore wind projects, does not
exceed 88 cents per month in 2018 dollars, over the duration of the proposed [OREC]
OCEC pricing schedule;
B. the projected incremental net rate impact for all
nonresidential customers considered as a blended average, combined with the projected net
rate impact of other Round 2 offshore wind projects, does not exceed 0.9% of nonresidential
customers’ total annual electric bills during any year of the proposed [OREC] OCEC
pricing schedule; and
C. the project is subject to a community benefit agreement.
(2) (i) When calculating the net benefits to the State under paragraph
(1)(ii) of this subsection, the Commission shall contract for the services of independent
consultants and experts.
(ii) When calculating the projected net average rate impacts for
Round 1 offshore wind projects under paragraph (1)(iii)1A and B of this subsection and for
Round 2 offshore wind projects under paragraph (1)(iii)2A and B of this subsection, the
Commission shall apply the same net [OREC] OCEC cost per megawatt–hour to
residential and nonresidential customers.
(3) An agreement required under paragraph (1)(i)2B of this subsection
shall:
(i) guarantee against strikes, lockouts, and similar disruptions;
(ii) ensure that all work on the project fully conforms to all relevant
State and federal laws, rules, and regulations;
(iii) create mutually binding procedures for resolving labor disputes
arising during the term of the project;

HOUSE BILL 970 21
(iv) set forth other mechanisms for labor–management cooperation
on matters of mutual interest and concern, including productivity, quality of work, safety,
and health; and
(v) bind all contractors and subcontractors to the terms of the
agreement through the inclusion of appropriate provisions in all relevant solicitation and
contract documents.
(g) (1) An order the Commission issues approving a proposed offshore wind
project shall:
(i) specify the [OREC] OCEC pricing schedule, which may not
authorize an [OREC] OCEC price greater than, for a Round 1 offshore wind project, $190
per megawatt–hour in 2012 dollars;
(ii) specify the duration of the [OREC] OCEC pricing schedule, not
to exceed 20 years;
(iii) specify the number of [ORECs] OCECS the offshore wind
project may sell each year;
(iv) provide that:
1. a payment may not be made for an [OREC] OCEC until
electricity supply is generated by the offshore wind project; and
2. ratepayers, purchasers of [ORECs] OCECS, and the
State shall be held harmless for any cost overruns associated with the offshore wind project;
and
(v) require that any debt instrument issued in connection with a
qualified offshore wind project include language specifying that the debt instrument does
not establish a debt, obligation, or liability of the State.
(2) An order approving a proposed offshore wind project vests the owner of
the qualified offshore wind project with the right to receive payments for [ORECs] OCECS
according to the terms in the order.
(3) On or before March 1 each year, the Commission shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate
Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Economic Matters
Committee on:
(i) compliance by applicants with the minority business enterprise
participation goals under subsection (e)(4) of this section; and

HOUSE BILL 970
(ii) with respect to the community benefit agreement under
subsection (f)(1) of this section:
1. the availability and use of opportunities for local
businesses and small, minority, women–owned, and veteran–owned businesses;
2. the success of efforts to promote career training
opportunities in the manufacturing, maintenance, and construction industries for local
residents, veterans, women, and minorities; and
3. compliance with the minority workforce goal under
subsection (f)(1)(i)5 of this section.
(h) For Round 2 offshore wind project applications, the Commission shall approve
[OREC] OCEC orders representing a minimum of 400 megawatts of nameplate capacity
proposed during each application period unless:
(1) not enough Round 2 offshore wind project applications are submitted to
meet the net benefit test under subsection (c)(3) of this section; or
(2) the cumulative net ratepayer impact exceeds the maximums provided
in subsection (f)(1)(ii)2 of this section.
(j) (3) (i) On or before 6 months after the issuance of an order approving
an [OREC] OCEC application, the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General and an approved
applicant, shall establish a clear plan for setting reasonable and appropriate minority
business enterprise participation goals and procedures for each phase of the qualified
offshore wind project.
(ii) To the extent practicable, the goals and procedures specified in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be based on the requirements of Title 14, Subtitle
3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article and the regulations implementing that
subtitle.
(iii) Every 6 months following the issuance of an order approving an
[OREC] OCEC application, an approved applicant shall submit a report on its progress
establishing and implementing minority business enterprise goals and procedures to the
Commission.
(k) (2) A developer seeking an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall certify that the exemption is required to fulfill the developer’s obligations
under an approved [OREC] OCEC order.
(l) (1) In this subsection, “revised Round 2 offshore wind project” means a
Round 2 offshore wind project that has filed an application with the Commission for revised

HOUSE BILL 970 23
project schedules, sizes, or pricing, including [OREC] OCEC pricing, under this
subsection.
(2) This subsection applies to Round 1 offshore wind projects and Round 2
offshore wind projects that:
(i) are to be located in a wind energy area authorized by the Bureau
of Ocean Energy Management; and
(ii) possess [ORECs] OCECS, or are subject to a Commission order
approving an [OREC] OCEC price schedule, as of June 1, 2024.
(3) (i) On June 1, 2024, the Commission shall open a revised Round 2
offshore wind project proceeding that is limited to evaluating revised project schedules,
sizes, or pricing, including [OREC] OCEC pricing, for a previously approved Round 2
offshore wind project.
(iii) An application for a revised Round 2 offshore wind project shall
be limited to addressing revised project schedules, sizes, or pricing, including [OREC]
OCEC pricing.
(4) (i) In order to maximize the amount of renewable energy generated
by a Round 1 offshore wind project, any Round 1 offshore wind project may seek approval
from the Commission to amend its previously approved Round 1 offshore wind project order
to:
1. increase the maximum amount of [ORECs] OCECS sold
under the previous order, consistent with the Round 1 offshore wind project ratepayer
protections under this section; and
2. modify its project schedule.
(ii) The Commission may approve a request for an increased amount
of [ORECs] OCECS sold under a previously approved Round 1 offshore wind project order
on a showing that:
1. the unit pricing of the additional [OREC] OCEC does not
exceed the pricing under the previously approved Round 1 offshore wind project order; and
2. the Round 1 offshore wind project is in compliance with
the ratepayer protection provisions required for Round 1 offshore wind projects, taking into
consideration changes in economic conditions since the original Round 1 offshore wind
project awards.
7–704.2.

HOUSE BILL 970
(a) (1) The Commission shall determine the offshore wind energy component
of the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under § 7–703(b)(12) through (25) of
this subtitle based on the projected annual creation of [ORECs] OCECS by qualified
offshore wind projects.
(2) The Commission shall establish the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard obligation for [ORECs] OCECS on a forward–looking basis that
includes a surplus to accommodate reasonable forecasting error in estimating overall
electricity sales in the State.
(3) Any positive adjustment to the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard shall be on a forward–looking basis and sufficiently in advance to allow an electric
company to reflect [OREC] OCEC costs as a nonbypassable surcharge to distribution
customers.
(4) The Commission shall adopt regulations that establish:
(i) the offshore wind purchase obligation sufficiently in advance to
allow an electric company to reflect [OREC] OCEC costs as a nonbypassable surcharge
paid by all distribution customers of the electric company;
(ii) a mechanism to adjust the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard obligation in a given year to accommodate a shortfall of [ORECs] OCECS in one
or more earlier years that is the result of the variation between the quantity of [ORECs]
OCECS calculated from the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard obligation and
the quantity of [ORECs] OCECS approved in the Commission order for the same years;
and
(iii) a nonbypassable surcharge that allows an electric company to
recover all costs associated with the purchase of [ORECs] OCECS from all distribution
customers of the electric company.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations:
(1) establishing an escrow account under Commission supervision; and
(2) defining rules that facilitate and ensure the secure and transparent
transfer of revenues and [ORECs] OCECS among the parties.
(c) (1) Each electric company shall purchase from the escrow account
established under this section the number of [ORECs] OCECS required to satisfy the
offshore wind energy component of the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under
§ 7–703(b)(12) through (25) of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 970 25
(2) (i) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the
Commission establishes, if there are insufficient [ORECs] OCECS available to satisfy the
electric companies’ [OREC] OCEC obligation, the overpayment shall be distributed to
electric companies to be refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the
customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard.
(ii) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the
Commission establishes, the calculation of an electric company’s [OREC] OCEC purchase
obligation shall be based on final electricity sales data as reported by the PJM
Interconnection as measured at the customer meter.
(3) For each [OREC] OCEC for which a qualified offshore wind project
receives payment, a qualified offshore wind project shall:
(i) sell all energy, capacity, and ancillary services associated with
the creation of [ORECs] OCECS into the markets operated by PJM Interconnection; and
(ii) distribute the proceeds received from the sales to PJM
Interconnection markets, under item (i) of this paragraph to electric companies to be
refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the customer’s consumption of
electricity supply that is subject to the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(4) Notwithstanding § 7–709 of this subtitle, the Commission shall adopt
regulations regarding the transfer and expiration of [ORECs] OCECS created by a
qualified offshore wind project in excess of the [OREC] OCEC pricing schedule.
7–704.4.
(b) (1) The Department of General Services, in consultation with the Public
Service Commission, shall issue a competitive sealed procurement solicitation and may
enter into at least one contract for a power purchase agreement to procure offshore wind
energy and associated [renewable] CLEAN energy credits from one or more qualified
offshore wind projects.
(c) (1) The Department of General Services shall identify the amount of
energy necessary to meet the State’s energy needs.
(2) (i) The State shall use the energy procured under subsection (b) of
this section to meet the State’s energy needs and retire the associated [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits to meet its obligations under the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard and Chapter 38 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2022.
(ii) The State shall be exempted from the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard requirements under § 7–703 of this subtitle if the Department of General

HOUSE BILL 970
Services procures 100% of the State’s energy needs from the power purchase agreement
required under subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The State shall offer for sale any energy or [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits remaining after the requirements under paragraph (2) of this subsection have been
met on the competitive wholesale power market operated by PJM Interconnection, through
bilateral sales to credit–worthy counterparties, or into [renewable] CLEAN energy credit
markets.
7–705.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each electricity
supplier shall submit a report to the Commission each year in a form and by a date specified
by the Commission that:
(i) 1. demonstrates that the electricity supplier has complied
with the applicable [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this
subtitle and includes the submission of the required amount of [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits; or
2. demonstrates the amount of electricity sales by which the
electricity supplier failed to meet the applicable [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard;
(ii) documents the level of participation of minority business
enterprises and minorities in the activities that support the creation of [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits used to satisfy the standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle, including
development, installation, and operation of generating facilities that create credits;
(iii) documents the amounts and types of generation associated with
[renewable] CLEAN energy credits purchased in compliance with § 7–707(c) of this subtitle
during the reporting period; and
(iv) documents the amount of [renewable] CLEAN energy certificates
that do not qualify as [renewable] CLEAN energy credits as defined in § 7–701 of this
subtitle, including, for each certificate:
1. the energy source associated with the certificate, including
its location, when it was constructed, and which electric distribution system received the
energy;
2. whether the purchase of the certificate was bundled with
a power purchase agreement from the energy source associated with the certificate;
3. whether the certificate was purchased directly from the
operator of the energy source or through a third party; and

HOUSE BILL 970 27
4. any other information required by the Commission.
(2) Paragraph (1)(iii) and (iv) of this subsection does not apply to:
(i) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this subtitle; or
(ii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title.
(b) (1) This subsection does not apply to a shortfall from the required Tier 1
renewable sources that is to be derived from post–2022 geothermal systems.
(2) If an electricity supplier fails to comply with the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard for the applicable year, the electricity supplier shall pay into the
Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the State
Government Article:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, a compliance fee
of:
1. the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall
from required Tier 1 renewable sources other than the shortfall from the required Tier 1
renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy:
A. 4 cents through 2016;
B. 3.75 cents in 2017 and 2018;
C. 3 cents in 2019 through 2023;
D. 2.75 cents in 2024;
E. 2.5 cents in 2025;
F. 2.475 cents in 2026;
G. 2.45 cents in 2027;
H. 2.25 cents in 2028 and 2029; and
I. 2.235 cents in 2030 and later;
2. the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall
from required Tier 1 renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy:
A. 45 cents in 2008;

HOUSE BILL 970
B. 40 cents in 2009 through 2014;
C. 35 cents in 2015 and 2016;
D. 19.5 cents in 2017;
E. 17.5 cents in 2018;
F. 10 cents in 2019;
G. 10 cents in 2020;
H. 8 cents in 2021;
I. 6 cents in 2022;
J. 6 cents in 2023;
K. 6 cents in 2024;
L. 5.5 cents in 2025;
M. 4.5 cents in 2026;
N. 3.5 cents in 2027;
O. 3.25 cents in 2028;
P. 2.5 cents in 2029; and
Q. 2.25 cents in 2030 and later; and
3. 1.5 cents for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required
Tier 2 renewable sources; or
(ii) for industrial process load:
1. for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required Tier 1
renewable sources, a compliance fee of:
A. 0.8 cents in 2006, 2007, and 2008;
B. 0.5 cents in 2009 and 2010;
C. 0.4 cents in 2011 and 2012;

HOUSE BILL 970 29
D. 0.3 cents in 2013 and 2014;
E. 0.25 cents in 2015 and 2016; and
F. except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, 0.2
cents in 2017 and later; and
2. nothing for any shortfall from required Tier 2 renewable
sources.
(3) For industrial process load, the compliance fee for each kilowatt–hour
of shortfall from required Tier 1 renewable sources is nothing for the year following any
year during which, after final calculations, the net rate impact per megawatt–hour from
Round 1 offshore wind projects exceeded $1.65 in 2012 dollars.
[(b–1)] (C) If an electricity supplier fails to comply with the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard that is required to be derived from post–2022 geothermal systems
for the applicable year, the electricity supplier shall pay into the Maryland Strategic
Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the State Government Article a
compliance fee of the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required
post–2022 geothermal systems:
(1) 10 cents in 2023 through 2025;
(2) 9 cents in 2026;
(3) 8 cents in 2027; and
(4) 6.5 cents in 2028 and later.
[(c)] (D) The Commission may allow an electricity supplier to submit the report
required under § 7–505(b)(4) of this title to demonstrate compliance with the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
[(d)] (E) An aggregator or broker who assists an electricity customer in
purchasing electricity but who does not supply the electricity or take title to or ownership
of the electricity may require the electricity supplier who supplies the electricity to
demonstrate compliance with this subtitle.
[(e)] (F) (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of § 7–703(b) of this subtitle,
if the actual or projected dollar–for–dollar cost incurred or to be incurred by an electricity
supplier solely for the purchase of Tier 1 [renewable] CLEAN energy credits derived from
solar energy in any 1 year is greater than or equal to, or is anticipated to be greater than
or equal to, 6.0% of the electricity supplier’s total annual electricity sales revenues in
Maryland, the electricity supplier may request that the Commission:

HOUSE BILL 970
(i) delay by 1 year each of the scheduled percentages for solar energy
under § 7–703(b) of this subtitle that would apply to the electricity supplier; and
(ii) allow the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for solar
energy for that year to continue to apply to the electricity supplier for the following year.
(2) In making its determination under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Commission shall consider the actual or projected dollar–for–dollar compliance costs of
other electricity suppliers.
(3) If an electricity supplier makes a request under paragraph (1) of this
subsection based on projected costs, the electricity supplier shall provide verifiable evidence
of the projections to the Commission at the time of the request.
(4) If the Commission allows a delay under paragraph (1) of this
subsection:
(i) the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for solar
energy applicable to the electricity supplier under the delay continues for each subsequent
consecutive year that the actual or projected dollar–for–dollar costs incurred, or to be
incurred, by the electricity supplier solely for the purchase of solar [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits is greater than or equal to, or is anticipated to be greater than or equal to,
6.0% of the electricity supplier’s total annual retail electricity sales revenues in Maryland;
and
(ii) the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for solar
energy applicable to the electricity supplier under the delay is increased to the next
scheduled percentage increase under § 7–703(b) of this subtitle for each year in which the
actual or projected dollar–for–dollar costs incurred, or to be incurred, by the electricity
supplier solely for the purchase of solar [renewable] CLEAN energy credits is less than, or
is anticipated to be less than, 6.0% of the electricity supplier’s total annual retail electricity
sales revenues in Maryland.
7–706.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, in accordance
with the obligation to provide standard offer service through the bid process created under
§ 7–510 of this title, the Commission shall allow an electricity supplier to recover actual
dollar–for–dollar costs incurred, including a compliance fee under § 7–705 of this subtitle,
in complying with a State–mandated [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) In accordance with the Phase II settlement agreement approved by the
Commission in Order No. 78710 in Case No. 8908 on September 30, 2003, for any
full–service agreement executed before the [renewable] CLEAN energy PORTFOLIO
standard under this subtitle applies to an electric company, the electric company and its
wholesale electricity suppliers may pass through their commercially reasonable additional

HOUSE BILL 970 31
costs, if any, associated with complying with the standard, through the end of the year of
standard offer service in which the requirement took effect.
(b) An electricity supplier may recover a compliance fee if:
(1) the payment of a compliance fee is the least–cost measure to customers
as compared to the purchase of Tier 1 renewable sources to comply with a [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard;
(2) there are insufficient Tier 1 renewable sources available for the
electricity supplier to comply with a [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard; or
(3) a wholesale electricity supplier defaults or otherwise fails to deliver
[renewable] CLEAN energy credits under a supply contract approved by the Commission.
7–707.
(a) In this section, “green power” means energy sources or [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits that are marketed as clean, green, eco–friendly, environmentally friendly or
responsible, carbon–free, renewable, 100% renewable, 100% wind, 100% hydro, 100% solar,
100% emission–free, or similar claims.
(c) An electricity supplier that supplies electricity to residential retail electric
customers may not market electricity as green power unless:
(1) the percentage of the electricity being offered, or the equivalent number
of [renewable] CLEAN energy credits associated with the electricity being marketed as
green power, that is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard equals or exceeds the greater of:
(i) 51%; or
(ii) 1% higher than the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard for the year the electricity is provided to the customer;
(d) (2) (iii) During a proceeding held under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the Commission:
1. shall consider:
A. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the [renewable] CLEAN energy credits;
B. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard;

HOUSE BILL 970
C. the state in which the electricity was generated; and
D. applicable market data; and
2. may consider whether the purchase of [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits was bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources
associated with the credit.
(3) (ii) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, at a proceeding held
under this paragraph the Commission may set a price per megawatt–hour that is higher
than the price determined in the proceeding held under paragraph (2) of this subsection for
an electricity supplier if:
3. the electricity supplier demonstrates to the Commission’s
satisfaction that the electricity supplier has a significant long–term investment in
renewable energy that meets the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under §
7–703 of this subtitle.
(iii) During a proceeding held under this paragraph, the Commission
shall consider:
1. whether the purchase of [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits was bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources associated
with the credit;
2. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the [renewable] CLEAN energy credits or power purchase agreements;
3. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard;
4. the state in which the electricity was generated; and
5. applicable market data.
(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2025, an electricity supplier shall purchase
[renewable] CLEAN energy credits for each year the electricity supplier offers green power
for sale to residential retail electric customers.
(2) A [renewable] CLEAN energy credit an electricity supplier purchases
under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be retired in a PJM Environmental Information
Services, Inc., generation attribute tracking system reserve subaccount accessible by the
Commission.
(f) (2) An electricity supplier that claims in the electricity supplier’s
marketing of electricity to residential retail electric customers that the customer will be

HOUSE BILL 970 33
purchasing green power shall include the following disclosure or a similar disclosure
approved by the Commission:
“We deliver energy through the purchase of [Renewable] CLEAN Energy Credits
[(RECs)] (CECS). A [REC] CEC represents the social good that accompanies 1
megawatt–hour of renewable electricity generation. [RECs] CECS may be sold separately
from renewable electricity itself. Renewable electricity and [RECs] CECS may be sold to
different entities. The purchase of a [REC] CEC does not indicate that renewable
electricity itself has been purchased by the entity that purchased the [REC] CEC.”.
(g) In addition to the disclosure required under subsection (f) of this section, the
Commission shall adopt regulations that require an electricity supplier, other than the
Department of General Services when the Department of General Services sells energy
under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle or a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this
title, that offers green power for sale to residential retail customers to include in the
electricity supplier’s marketing materials a disclosure, written in plain language, that
explains:
(4) the percentage of electricity that would be provided by the electricity
supplier that is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard; and
7–708.
(a) (1) The Commission shall establish and maintain a market–based
renewable electricity trading system to facilitate the creation and transfer of [renewable]
CLEAN energy credits.
(2) To the extent practicable, the trading system shall be consistent with
and operate in conjunction with the trading system developed by PJM Interconnection, Inc.,
if available.
(3) The Commission may contract with a for–profit or a nonprofit entity to
assist in the administration of the electricity trading system required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection.
(b) (1) The system shall include a registry of pertinent information regarding
all:
(i) available [renewable] CLEAN energy credits; and
(ii) [renewable] CLEAN energy credit transactions among electricity
suppliers in the State, including:
1. the creation and application of [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits;

HOUSE BILL 970
2. the number of [renewable] CLEAN energy credits sold or
transferred; and
3. the price paid for the sale or transfer of [renewable]
CLEAN energy credits.
(2) (i) The registry shall provide current information to electricity
suppliers and the public on the status of [renewable] CLEAN energy credits created, sold,
or transferred in the State.
(ii) Registry information shall be available by computer network
access through the Internet.
7–709.
(a) An electricity supplier may use accumulated [renewable] CLEAN energy
credits to meet the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard, including credits created
by a renewable on–site generator.
(b) A [renewable] CLEAN energy credit may be sold or otherwise transferred.
(c) (1) (i) If an electricity supplier purchases solar [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits directly from a renewable on–site generator with a capacity that exceeds 10
kilowatts to meet the solar component of the Tier 1 [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard, the duration of the contract term for the solar [renewable] CLEAN energy credits
may not be less than 15 years.
(ii) The minimum required term under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph does not affect the ability of the parties to negotiate a price for a solar
[renewable] CLEAN energy credit that varies over time in any manner.
(2) (i) An electricity supplier that purchases solar [renewable] CLEAN
energy credits from a renewable on–site generator with a capacity not exceeding 10
kilowatts shall purchase the credits with a single initial payment representing the full
estimated production of the system for the life of the contract.
(ii) The Commission shall:
1. develop a method for estimating annual production from
the type of system described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and allocating the credits
to the electricity supplier in a manner that is consistent with the duration of the contract;
and
2. determine the rate for a payment made to a renewable
on–site generator under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.

HOUSE BILL 970 35
(d) (1) Except as authorized under paragraph (2) of this subsection, a
[renewable] CLEAN energy credit shall exist for 5 years from the date created.
(2) A [renewable] CLEAN energy credit may be diminished or extinguished
before the expiration of 5 years by:
(i) the electricity supplier that received the credit;
(ii) a nonaffiliated entity of the electricity supplier:
1. that purchased the credit from the electricity supplier
receiving the credit; or
2. to whom the electricity supplier otherwise transferred the
credit; or
(iii) demonstrated noncompliance by the generating facility with the
requirements of § 7–704(f) of this subtitle.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(2)(iii) of this section, and only if the
demonstrated noncompliance does not result in environmental degradation, an electricity
supplier that reasonably includes in its annual report under § 7–705 of this subtitle a
[renewable] CLEAN energy credit that is extinguished for noncompliance with § 7–704(f)(1)
or (2) of this subtitle:
(1) may continue to rely on that credit for that year; but
(2) for later years must:
(i) demonstrate a return to compliance of the generating facility
under § 7–704(f) of this subtitle; or
(ii) replace the credit with a [renewable] CLEAN energy credit from
another source.
(f) The Commission by regulation shall establish requirements for
documentation and verification of [renewable] CLEAN energy credits by licensed electricity
suppliers and other generators that create and receive credits for compliance with the
standards for Tier 1 renewable sources and Tier 2 renewable sources.
7–709.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Brownfield” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this title.

HOUSE BILL 970
(3) “Certified [SREC”] SCEC” means a solar [renewable] CLEAN energy
credit generated by a certified system.
(4) “Certified system” means a solar energy generating system certified by
the Commission under the Program to generate certified [SRECs] SCECS with the
compliance value specified in subsection (c) of this section.
(5) “Program” means the Small Solar Energy Generating System Incentive
Program.
(c) (1) Under the Program, a certified system shall generate certified [SRECs]
SCECS.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the provisions of
this subtitle relating to [renewable] CLEAN energy credits shall apply to certified [SRECs]
SCECS.
(3) A certified [SREC] SCEC shall have a compliance value of 150% for
electricity suppliers to put toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard for energy derived from solar energy under § 7–703 of this subtitle.
(d) To be eligible for certification under the Program, a solar energy generating
system shall:
(2) be eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard;
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the Commission, at the
time of certifying a solar energy generating system as a Tier 1 renewable source, shall
certify the system as eligible to generate certified [SRECs] SCECS in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section if the applicant submits with its application for certification as
a Tier 1 renewable source:
(1) a form requesting to be certified to receive certified [SRECs] SCECS
with the value specified in subsection (c) of this section;
(2) a copy of the interconnection agreement between the applicant and the
applicant’s electric company indicating that the size of the system is eligible;
(3) if seeking certification as a system located on or over an area specified
under subsection (d)(5)(iii) of this section, a copy of the final approval of the local building
permit;
(4) if seeking certification as a system located on a brownfield,
documentation demonstrating that the system is located on a brownfield;

HOUSE BILL 970 37
(5) if seeking certification based on aggregated net metering, a copy of the
aggregated net energy metering rider submitted with the interconnection agreement; and
(6) any other information required by the Commission.
(i) (1) A certified system shall continue to be eligible to generate certified
[SRECs] SCECS for 15 years after the date of certification by the Commission, or January
1, 2025, whichever is later, after which the system shall be eligible to generate noncertified
solar [renewable] CLEAN energy credits as long as the system meets the requirements as
a Tier 1 renewable source under this subtitle.
(2) The Commission shall:
(i) on or before January 1, 2025, begin determining eligibility of
solar energy generating systems to be certified under the Program; and
(ii) on or before July 1, 2026, implement a revised system to review
and ensure compliance with the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(3) An electricity supplier may apply the certified SRECs generated in
accordance with this section toward the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard
starting with the 2025 compliance year.
(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the Commission shall allow electricity
suppliers to demonstrate compliance with the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard for the 2025 compliance year by submitting information between July 1, 2026,
and December 31, 2026, using the revised system developed in accordance with paragraph
(2)(ii) of this subsection.
7–710.
The Commission may impose an administrative fee on a [renewable] CLEAN energy
credit transaction, but the amount of the fee may not exceed the Commission’s actual direct
cost of processing the transaction.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.

HOUSE BILL 970
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect all clean energy
portfolio standard compliance years that begin on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.